Washington statutes.
RCW 41.56.203

University of Washington—Certain employees enrolled in an academic program—Scope of collective bargaining.

(1) In addition to the entities listed in RCW 41.56.020, this chapter applies to the University of Washington with respect to employees who are enrolled in an academic program and are in a classification in (a) through (i) of this subsection on any University of Washington campus. The employees in (a) through (i) of this subsection constitute an appropriate bargaining unit:

(a) Predoctoral instructor;

(b) Predoctoral lecturer;

(c) Predoctoral teaching assistant;

(d) Predoctoral teaching associates I and II;

(e) Tutors, readers, and graders in all academic units and tutoring centers;

(f) Predoctoral staff assistant;

(g) Predoctoral staff associates I and II;

(h) Except as provided in this subsection (1)(h), predoctoral researcher, predoctoral research assistant, and predoctoral research associates I and II. The employees that constitute an appropriate bargaining unit under this subsection (1) do not include predoctoral researchers, predoctoral research assistants, and predoctoral research associates I and II who are performing research primarily related to their dissertation and who have incidental or no service expectations placed upon them by the university; and

(i) All employees enrolled in an academic program whose duties and responsibilities are substantially equivalent to those employees in (a) through (h) of this subsection.

(2)(a) The scope of bargaining for employees at the University of Washington under this section excludes:

(i) The ability to terminate the employment of any individual if the individual is not meeting academic requirements as determined by the University of Washington;

(ii) The amount of tuition or fees at the University of Washington. However, tuition and fee remission and waiver is within the scope of bargaining;

(iii) The academic calendar of the University of Washington; and

(iv) The number of students to be admitted to a particular class or class section at the University of Washington.

(b)(i) Except as provided in (b)(ii) of this subsection, provisions of collective bargaining agreements relating to compensation must not exceed the amount or percentage established by the legislature in the appropriations act. If any compensation provision is affected by subsequent modification of the appropriations act by the legislature, both parties must immediately enter into collective bargaining for the sole purpose of arriving at a mutually agreed upon replacement for the affected provision.

(ii) The University of Washington may provide additional compensation to student employees covered by this section that exceeds that provided by the legislature.

[ 2002 c 34 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—2002 c 34: "(1) This act is intended to promote cooperative labor relations between the University of Washington and the employees who provide instructional, research, and related academic services, and who are enrolled as students at the university by extending collective bargaining rights under chapter 41.56 RCW and using the orderly procedures administered by the public employment relations commission. To achieve this end, the legislature intends that under chapter 41.56 RCW the university will exclusively bargain in good faith over all matters within the scope of bargaining under RCW 41.56.203.

(2) The legislature recognizes the importance of the shared governance practices developed at the University of Washington. The legislature does not intend to restrict, limit, or prohibit the exercise of the functions of the faculty in any shared governance mechanisms or practices, including the faculty senate, faculty councils, and faculty codes of the University of Washington; nor does the legislature intend to restrict, limit, or prohibit the exercise of the functions of the graduate and professional student senate, the associated students of the University of Washington, or any other student organization in matters outside the scope of bargaining covered by chapter 41.56 RCW.

(3) The legislature intends that nothing in this act will restrict, limit, or prohibit the University of Washington from consideration of the merits, necessity, or organization of any program, activity, or service established by the University of Washington, including, but not limited to, any decision to establish, modify, or discontinue any such program, activity, or service. The legislature further intends that nothing in this act will restrict, limit, or prohibit the University of Washington from having sole discretion over admission requirements for students, criterion for the award of certificates and degrees to students, academic criterion for selection of employees covered by this chapter, initial appointment of students, and the content, conduct, and supervision of courses, curricula, grading requirements, and research programs.

(4) The legislature does not intend to limit the matters excluded from collective bargaining to those items specified in this act." [ 2002 c 34 s 1.]

Effective date—2002 c 34: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [March 14, 2002]." [ 2002 c 34 s 3.]